Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 6. Use of Arrest Photographs

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§
40-12-601.
Unauthorized use of arrest photographs; penalty.

A person who operates a website that disseminates photographic records of arrested individuals made by law enforcement agencies as part of routinely documenting an arrest and who charges individuals to remove their photographs shall remove any photograph and related name and personal information from all websites owned or controlled by that person without charging a fee within thirty (30) days of the date of a request to remove the photograph and information if the request:

Is made in writing; and

Contains written documentation that all charges stemming from the arrest for which the photograph was made:

Were resolved through acquittal or otherwise without a conviction; or

Following conviction, were expunged or set aside pursuant to court order.

For purposes of this section, paper or electronic copies of official court records or law enforcement records constitute written documentation.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section commits an unlawful practice under W.S.

40-12-105

.

History:

2014 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.